apertium-tt-ba.ba.twol
Alphabet

 А Б В Г Ғ Д Ҙ Е Ё Ж З И Й К Ҡ Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Ҫ Т У Ү Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ә Ю Я 
 а б в г ғ д ҙ е ё ж з и й к ҡ л м н ң о ө п р с ҫ т у ү ф х һ ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ә ю я

 %{A%}:а %{I%}:ы %{E%}:а

 %{L%}:л %{G%}:г %{N%}:н %{K%}:к

 %{h%}:һ %{n%}:н %{l%}:л

 %>:0  ; 

Sets

SurVow          =  А О Ә Е Э И Ө У Ү Ы Ю Я
                а о ә е э и ө у ү ы ю я  ; 


Vow          =  А О Ә Е Э И Ө У Ү Ы Ю Я
                а о ә е э и ө у ү ы ю я 
               %{E%} %{A%} %{I%} ;

Cns          =  Б В Г Ғ Д Ҙ Ж З Й К Ҡ Л М Н Ң П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь 
                б в г ғ д ҙ ж з й к ҡ л м н ң п р с ҫ т ф х һ ц ч ш щ ъ ь ; 

Vow1         =  Ү У Ю
                ү у ю ; 

! Cns1         =  П Т К Ҡ Ф Ҫ С Ш Щ Х Һ Б Г Ғ Д Ц Ч
!                 п т к ҡ ф ҫ с ш щ х һ б г ғ д ц ч ;
! 
! Cns2         =  Й Ҙ Р 
!                 й ҙ р ; 
! 
! Cns3         =  Ж З Л М Н Ң  
!                 ж з л м н ң  ; 

BackVow      =  А О Ы У Ю Я
                а о ы у ю я ; 

FrontVow     =  Ә Е Э И Ө Ү
                ә е э и ө ү ; 

CnsVoiceless     =  П Т К Ҡ Ф Ҫ С Ш Щ Х Һ Б Г Ғ Д Ц Ч
                    п т к ҡ ф ҫ с ш щ х һ б г ғ д ц ч ; 

CnsVcdConts      =  Й В Р Ҙ      ! Voiced Continuants
                    й в р ҙ ;

CnsVcdNonConts   =  Л М Н Ң Ж    ! Voiced Non-Continuants
                    л м н ң ж ;

Nasals           = М Н Ң 
                   м н ң ; 

FrontCns         = К Г Ь
                   к г ь ;

BackCns          = Ҡ Ғ 
                   ҡ ғ ;


Rules 


"{E} turns to й after a vowel"
%{E%}:й <=> :SurVow %>: _ ;

!!!! Vowel Harmony !!!!
"A Vowel Harmony"
%{A%}:ә <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;

"I Vowel Harmony"
%{I%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
            except
                                  %{n%}:н/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;

"E Vowel Harmony"
%{E%}:ә <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ;
    except
         :SurVow %>: _ ;

"Deletion of {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
            except
         [ :SurVow :у ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;


"Deletion of {A} after vowels"
%{A%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;



! "Alternation in locative -DA"
! %{L%}:Cx <=> :Lx %>: _ %{A%}: [ .#. | %>: ];
!         where Lx in ( а о е э и ө у ү ы ә ю я в й ҙ р ) 
!               Cx in ( л л л л л л л л л л л л ҙ ҙ ҙ ҙ ) 
!         matched ;           
!
! "Plural alternation"
! %{L%}:ҙ <=> [ :Cns2 | :Vow1 ]  %>: _ %{A%}: р ;
!
! "Plural alternation after voiceless consonant"
! %{L%}:т <=> [ :Cns1 | :в ] %>: _ %{A%}: р ;
!
! "Plural alternation after other voiced consonants"
! %{L%}:д <=> :Cns3 %>: _ %{A%}: р ;


!!!! Desonorisation !!!!

"L desonorisation after continuants"
%{L%}:ҙ <=> [ :CnsVcdConts ]/[ %>: | :0 | %  ] _ ;

"N desonorisation after continuants"
%{N%}:ҙ <=> [ :CnsVcdConts ]/[ %>: | :0 | %  ] _ ;
            except
                               %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;

"L desonorisation after non-continuants"
%{L%}:д <=> [ :CnsVcdNonConts ]/[ %>: | :0 | %  ] _ ;

"N desonorisation after non-continuants"
%{N%}:д <=> [ :CnsVcdNonConts ]/[ %>: | :0 | %  ] _ ;
            except
                                  %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;

!!!! Special archiphonemes !!!!

"Deletion of {h} after a consonant"
%{h%}:0 <=> [ :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
      [ :SurVow :у ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"Deletion of accusative {N} after {n}"
%{N%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;

!"Deletion of {n} before genitive {N}s"
!%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{N%}: %{I%}: \[ .#. ]  ;
!
!"Deletion of {n} before ablative {N}"
!%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{N%}: %{A%}: :н ;

"Deletion of {n} before any {N} except accusative"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{N%}: ;
            except
            _ %>: %{N%}: %{I%}: .#. ;

"Deletion of {I} after {n}"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}:н/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;

"/n/ deletion in px3 nominative"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ .#. ;

"Deletion of dative {G} after px1sg, px2sg"
%{G%}:0 <=>  %{I%}: :Nasals %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;


!!!! Voicing assimilation, etc. !!!!

"Intervocalic voicing of к/ҡ"
Cx:Cy <=> :Vow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :Vow ;
          where Cx in ( п к ҡ )
                Cy in ( б г ғ )
                matched;


! "N desonorisation after voiceless consonants"
! %{N%}:т <=> [ :CnsVoiceless ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!             except
!                                 %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;

"Forward voicing assimilation"
Cx:Cy <=> :CnsVoiceless/[ %>: | %  ] _ ;
          where Cx in ( %{M%}  %{L%}  %{N%} )
                Cy in (   п      т      т   )
                matched;

"Back assimilation of G"
%{G%}:ғ <=> [ :BackVow :Cns* ]/[ %>: | :0 | :и | :у ] _ ;
            except
    :CnsVoiceless/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
        :FrontCns/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                   :Nasals %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;

"Voicing assimilation of back G"
%{G%}:ҡ <=> [ :BackVow :Cns* [ :CnsVoiceless - :FrontCns ] ]/[ %>: ] _ ;

"Voicing assimilation of front G"
%{G%}:к <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* [ :CnsVoiceless - :BackCns ] ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
!                               [ :CnsVoiceless & :FrontCns ]/[ %>: ] _ ;

"Passive {l} becomes n after verb stem ending in /l/ or /r/"
%{l%}:н <=> [ л :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
            [ р :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;

"Voicing assimilation of back K"
%{K%}:ҡ <=> [ :BackVow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ; 
